Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.060

Powers and authority are supplemental.

The powers and authority conferred upon governmental agencies under the provisions of this chapter, shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of such governmental agencies.

[ 1967 c 109 s 6.]